Washington statutes.
RCW 44.90.040

Collective bargaining—Negotiations and agreement start dates.

Collective bargaining negotiations under this chapter shall commence no earlier than May 1, 2024. No collective bargaining agreement entered into under this chapter may take effect prior to July 1, 2025.

[ 2022 c 283 s 4.]